Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-426
Actuarial opinions; valuation of sickness and accident policies.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations containing the minimum standards applicable to the valuation of sickness and accident policies.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 13.